src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON N_14HAMMAS !!= @CODE@ hammas:ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}, saabas:saapa
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation
:%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_14HAMMAS-SG ;
        N_14HAMMAS_PL ;
LEXICON N_14HAMMAS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES-SG ;
LEXICON N_14HAMMAS_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES_PL ;

LEXICON N_14IKAES !!= @CODE@ ikäs:ikkä
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation
:%^Pen%^WGStem ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_14IKAES-SG ;
        N_14IKAES_PL ;
LEXICON N_14IKAES-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES-SG ;
LEXICON N_14IKAES_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_14HAMMAS/IKAES_PL ;

LEXICON N_14NUMMWR1 !!= @CODE@ nummõŕ:numbõr
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to gradation
:%^Pen%^WGStem%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^Pen%^WGStem%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_14NUMMWR1-SG ;
        N_14NUMMWR1_PL ;
LEXICON N_14NUMMWR1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_14NUMMWR1/XX-SG ;
LEXICON N_14NUMMWR1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_14NUMMWR1/XX_PL ;


!LEXICON N_PEREH !!= @CODE@ pereh:pereh
!! vowel_harmony: front
!! gradation: yes
!!! distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to word final h
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_PEREH-SG ;
!        N_PEREH_PL ;

!LEXICON N_PEREH-SG
!:%{front%}     NMN_PEREH-SG ;
!LEXICON N_PEREH_PL
!:%{front%}     NMN_PEREH_PL ;

!LEXICON N_HAMWH !!= @CODE@ hamõh:hamõh
!! vowel_harmony: back
!! gradation: yes
!!! distinguished from 14RITS1KAS due to word final h
!: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
!        N_HAMWH-SG ;
!        N_HAMWH_PL ;

!LEXICON N_HAMWH-SG
!:%{back%}     NMN_HAMWH-SG ;
!LEXICON N_HAMWH_PL
!:%{back%}     NMN_HAMWH_PL ;


LEXICON N_15KOTUS
!! kotus:kotus
!! * Yaml: **N-kotus15**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_15KOTUS-SG ;
        N_15KOTUS_PL ;
LEXICON N_15KOTUS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-SG ;
LEXICON N_15KOTUS_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES_PL ;

LEXICON N_15ILVES
!! kotus:kotus
!! * Yaml: **N-ilves15**
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_15ILVES-SG ;
        N_15ILVES_PL ;
LEXICON N_15ILVES-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES-SG ;
LEXICON N_15ILVES_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_15KOTUS/ILVES_PL ;


LEXICON N_16INEMINE !!= @CODE@
!! inemine:inemi
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: **N-inemine16**
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_16INEMINE-SG ;
 N_16INEMINE_PL ;
LEXICON N_16INEMINE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE-SG ;
LEXICON N_16INEMINE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE_PL ;

LEXICON N_16ABILINW !!= @CODE@
!! abilinõ:abili
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: **N-abilinw16**
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_16ABILINW-SG ;
 N_16ABILINW_PL ;
LEXICON N_16ABILINW-SG
:%{back%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE-SG ;
LEXICON N_16ABILINW_PL
:%{back%} NMN_16ABILINW/INEMINE_PL ;

LEXICON N_16TERAEKENE !!= @CODE@
!! inemine:inemi
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: **N-inemine16**
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_16TERAEKENE-SG ;
 N_16TERAEKENE_PL ;
LEXICON N_16TERAEKENE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_16TSIRGUKWNW/TERAEKENE-SG ;
LEXICON N_16TERAEKENE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_16TSIRGUKWNW/TERAEKENE_PL ;

LEXICON N_16TSIRGUKWNW !!= @CODE@
!! tsirgukõnõ:abili
! Gradation: No
!! * Yaml: **N-abilinw16**
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_16TSIRGUKWNW-SG ;
 N_16TSIRGUKWNW_PL ;
LEXICON N_16TSIRGUKWNW-SG
:%{back%} NMN_16TSIRGUKWNW/TERAEKENE-SG ;
LEXICON N_16TSIRGUKWNW_PL
:%{back%} NMN_16TSIRGUKWNW/TERAEKENE_PL ;

LEXICON N_17ALGUS
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_17ALGUS-SG ;
        N_17ALGUS_PL ;
LEXICON N_17ALGUS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_17ALGUS/UETSUES-SG ;
LEXICON N_17ALGUS_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_17ALGUS/UETSUES_PL ;


LEXICON N_17UETSUES
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_17UETSUES-SG ;
        N_17UETSUES_PL ;
LEXICON N_17UETSUES-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_17ALGUS/UETSUES-SG ;
LEXICON N_17UETSUES_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_17ALGUS/UETSUES_PL ;

LEXICON N_18AIVASTUS
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_18AIVASTUS-SG ;
        N_18AIVASTUS_PL ;
LEXICON N_18AIVASTUS-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES-SG ;
LEXICON N_18AIVASTUS_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES_PL ;


LEXICON N_18EHITUES
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_18EHITUES-SG ;
        N_18EHITUES_PL ;
LEXICON N_18EHITUES-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES-SG ;
LEXICON N_18EHITUES_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_18AIVASTUS/EHITUES_PL ;

LEXICON N_19ALOMANW !!= @CODE@ alomanõ:aloma
! Gradation: No
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ; !CHECKME 2016-09-27
        N_19ALOMANW-SG ;
        N_19ALOMANW_PL ;
LEXICON N_19ALOMANW-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
LEXICON N_19ALOMANW_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_PL ;

LEXICON N_19PEDAEJAENE !!= @CODE@ pedäjäne:pedäjä
! Gradation: No
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_19PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
 N_19PEDAEJAENE_PL ;
LEXICON N_19PEDAEJAENE-SG
:%{front%} NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE-SG ;
LEXICON N_19PEDAEJAENE_PL
:%{front%} NMN_19ALOMANW/PEDAEJAENE_PL ;


LEXICON N_20LATS1 !!= @CODE@ latś:lat%{sś%}
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_20LATS1-SG ;
        N_20LATS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_20LATS1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_20LATS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_20LATS1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_20LATS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_20TAEUES1 !!= @CODE@ täüś:täü
:ś ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_20TAEUES1-SG ;
 N_20TAEUES1_PL ;
LEXICON N_20TAEUES1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_20TAEUES1-SG ;
LEXICON N_20TAEUES1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_20TAEUES1_PL ;

LEXICON N_20VIIS1 !!= @CODE@ täüś:täü
:ś ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_20VIIS1-SG ;
 N_20VIIS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_20VIIS1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_20XX/VIIS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_20VIIS1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_20XX/VIIS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_20ORS1 !!= @CODE@ täüś:täü
:ś ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_20ORS1-SG ;
 N_20ORS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_20ORS1-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_20ORS1/HIRS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_20ORS1_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_20ORS1/HIRS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_20HIRS1 !!= @CODE@ täüś:täü
:ś ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_20HIRS1-SG ;
 N_20HIRS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_20HIRS1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_20ORS1/HIRS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_20HIRS1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_20ORS1/HIRS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_20VAEITS1 !!= @CODE@ väitś:väits
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_20VAEITS1-SG ;
 N_20VAEITS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_20VAEITS1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_20VAEITS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_20VAEITS1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_20VAEITS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_20KUEUEDS1 !!= @CODE@ küüdś:küüds
:%^PAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%^NoPAL ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_20KUEUEDS1-SG ;
        N_20KUEUEDS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_20KUEUEDS1-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_20KUEUEDS1-SG ;
LEXICON N_20KUEUEDS1_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_20KUEUEDS1_PL ;

LEXICON N_20MIIS1 !!= @CODE@ miiś:m
:i̬i̬ś ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_20MIIS1-SG ;
        N_20MIIS1_PL ;
LEXICON N_20MIIS1-SG
:     NMN_20MIIS1-SG ;!front comes later
LEXICON N_20MIIS1_PL
:     NMN_20MIIS1_PL ;


LEXICON N_21HUEDSI !!= @CODE@ hüdsi:hü
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_21HUEDSI-SG ;
        N_21HUEDSI_PL ;
LEXICON N_21HUEDSI-SG
:%{front%}     NMN_21HUEDSI-SG ;
LEXICON N_21HUEDSI_PL
:%{front%}     NMN_21HUEDSI_PL ;


LEXICON N_21KUSI !!= @CODE@ kusi:kus
: ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
 N_21KUSI-SG ;
        N_21KUSI_PL ;
LEXICON N_21KUSI-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_21KUSI-SG ;
LEXICON N_21KUSI_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_21KUSI_PL ;

LEXICON N_22VWROKWNW !!= @CODE@ võrokõnõ:võrokõ
! Gradation: No
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_22VWROKWNW-SG ;
 N_22VWROKWNW_PL ;
LEXICON N_22VWROKWNW-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE-SG ;
LEXICON N_22VWROKWNW_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_22VWROKWNW/VAEHAEKENE_PL ;

LEXICON N_22NAANW !!= @CODE@ naanõ:naa
! Gradation: No
:s ATTESTED-NOUN-STEM-CONTINUED ;
        N_22NAANW-SG ;
        N_22NAANW_PL ;
LEXICON N_22NAANW-SG
:%{back%}     NMN_22NAANW-SG ;
LEXICON N_22NAANW_PL
:%{back%}     NMN_22NAANW_PL ;
