src/fst/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
parrus+N:%{ˋØ%}#parrus N_17ALGUS "_#, #t__ˋparru|s_" ;
höölmäs+N:h%{öü%}%{öü%}lmä%{sØ%} N_14IKAES "_hü̬ü̬l(m)ä, hööl(m)äst__höölmäs_" ;
kilgas+N:kil%{kg%}a%{sØ%} N_14HAMMAS "_ˋkilka, kilgast__kilgas_" ;
kääbäs+N:kää%{pb%}ä%{sØ%} N_14IKAES "_ˋkääpä, kääbäst__kääbäs_" ;
leigas+N:lei%{kg%}a%{sØ%} N_14HAMMAS "_ˋleika, leigast__leigas_" ;
nummõŕ+N:num%{bm%}õ%{rŕ%} N_14NUMMWR1 "_ˋnumbri, nummõrd__nummõŕ_" ;
telefoninummõŕ+N:telefoni#num%{bm%}õ%{rŕ%} N_14NUMMWR1 "_ˋnumbri, nummõrd__nummõŕ_" ;
pakkrattaq+N:pakkra%{tØ%}ta%{sØ%} N_14HAMMAS_PL "_#idõ, #it__pakkratt|aq_" ;
rattaq+N:ra%{tØ%}ta%{sØ%} N_14HAMMAS_PL "_#idõ, #it__ratt|aq_" ;
saarnõh+N:saarnõ%{hØ%} N_14HAMMAS "_ˋsaarnõ, saarnõht__saarnõh_" ;
välgäs+N:väl%{kg%}ä%{sØ%} N_14IKAES "_ˋvälkä, välgäst__välgäs_" ;
keres+N:keres N_15ILVES "_#(s)e, #t__keres_" ;
keskkotus+N:keskkotus N_15KOTUS "_#(s)õ, #t__keskkotus_" ;
majas+N:majas N_15KOTUS "_#(s)õ, #t__majas_" ;
meres+N:meres N_15ILVES "_#(s)e, #t__meres_" ;
pidossõq+N:pidos N_15KOTUS_PL "_#(s)idõ, #(s)it__pidos|sõq_" ;
ratus+N:ratus N_15KOTUS "_#(s)õ, #t__ratus_" ;
suupühüs+N:suupühüs N_15ILVES "_#(s)e, #t__suupühüs_" ;
taossõq+N:%{ˋØ%}#taos N_15KOTUS_PL "_#sidõ, #sit__ˋtaos|sõq_" ;
tõlgusõq+N:tõlgus N_15KOTUS_PL "_#idõ, #it__tõlgu(s)s|õq_" ;
iirläne+N:%{ˋØ%}#iirlä N_16INEMINE "_#se, #st__ˋiirlä|ne_" ;
juuminõ+N:ju̬u̬mi N_16ABILINW "_#sõ, #st__ju̬u̬mi|nõ_" ;
liivlanõ+N:%{ˋØ%}#liivla N_16ABILINW "_#sõ, #st__ˋliivla|nõ_" ;
luudusõtsäpändämine+N:lu̬u̬dusõtsäpändämi N_16INEMINE "_#se, #st__lu̬u̬dusõtsäpändämi|ne_" ;
poiskõnõ+N:poiskõ N_16TSIRGUKWNW "_#sõ, #st__opili|nõ_" ;
suumlanõ+N:su̬u̬mla N_16ABILINW "_#sõ, #st__su̬u̬mla|nõ_" ;
teräkene+N:teräke N_16TERAEKENE "_#se, #st__teräke|ne_" ;
tsibihärbläne+N:tsibi%{ˋØ%}härblä N_16INEMINE "_#se, #st__tsibi%{ˋØ%}härblä|ne_" ;
tütrigukõnõ+N:tütrigukõ N_16TSIRGUKWNW "_#sõ, #st__opili|nõ_" ;
tsirgukõnõ+N:tsirgukõ N_16TSIRGUKWNW "_#sõ, #st__opili|nõ_" ;
virmalisõq+N:virmali N_16ABILINW_PL "_#.liisi, #.liisi __virma|lisõq_" ;
lontrus+N:lontrus N_17ALGUS ;
lämmüs+N:%{ˋØ%}#lämmüs N_17UETSUES "_#e, #t __ˋlämmüs_" ;
sündsüs+N:%{ˋØ%}#sündsüs N_17UETSUES "_#e, #t__ˋsündsüs_" ;
õndsus+N:%{ˋØ%}#õ̭ndsus N_17ALGUS "_#õ, #t__ˋõ̭ndsus_" ;
tiinüs+N:tiinüs N_18EHITUES ;
kivvutus+N:kivvutus N_18AIVASTUS "_#õ, #t__kivvutus_" ;
küsümüs+N:küsümüs N_18EHITUES "_#e, #t__küsümüs_" ;
nõdõrmus+N:nõdõrmus N_18AIVASTUS "_#õ, #t__nõdõrmus_" ;
hämmähüs+N:hämmähüs N_18EHITUES ;
kälüskidseq+N:kälüski N_19PEDAEJAENE_PL "_#%{ˋØ%}kiidsi, #%{ˋØ%}kiidsi__kälüs|kidseq_" ;
käändjäne+N:%{ˋØ%}#käändjä N_19PEDAEJAENE "_#dse, #st__ˋkäändjä|ne_" ;
olõminõ+N:olõmi N_19ALOMANW "_#sõ, #st__olõmi|nõ_" ;
päiviline+N:päivili N_19PEDAEJAENE "_#dse, #st__päivili|ne_" ;
sõrmulinõ+N:sõrmuli N_19ALOMANW "_#dsõ, #st__sõrmuli|nõ_" ;
sõsaridsõq+N:sõ̭sari N_19ALOMANW_PL "_#%{ˋØ%}riidsi, #%{ˋØ%}riidsi__sõ̭sa|ridsõq_" ;
virmalidsõq+N:virmali N_19ALOMANW_PL "_#.liidsi, #.liidsi__virma|lidsõq_" ;
kasulatś+N:kasulat%{sś%} N_20LATS1 "_#latsõ, #last__kasu|latś_" ;
kõrdsimiiś+N:kõrdsim%{ei%}%{ei%} N_20MIIS1 "_#mehe, #mi̬i̬st__kõrdsi|mi̬i̬ś_" ;
küüdś+N:küüd%{sś%} N_20KUEUEDS1 "_küüdse, küüst__küüdś_" ;
lõhmusniidś+N:lõhmusniid%{sś%} N_20KUEUEDS1 "_#niidse, #niist__lõhmus|niidś_" ;
lõikväits+N:lõikväits N_20VAEITS1 "_#väidse, #väist__lõik|väits_" ;
maaväitś+N:maaväit%{sś%} N_20VAEITS1 "_#väidse, #väist__maa|väitś_" ;
päämiiś+N:pääm%{ei%}%{ei%} N_20MIIS1 "_#mehe, #mi̬i̬st__pää|mi̬i̬ś_" ;
tütäŕlatś+N:tütäŕlat%{sś%} N_20LATS1 "_#latsõ, #last__tütäŕ|latś_" ;
võidumeheq+N:võidum%{ei%}%{ei%} N_20MIIS1_PL "_#mi̬i̬hi, #mi̬i̬hi__võidu|meheq_" ;
nahatäüś+N:nahatäü N_20TAEUES1 "_#tävve, #täüt__naha|täüś_" ;
täüś+N:täü N_20TAEUES1 "_tävve, täüt__täüś_" ;
hüdsi+N:hü%{tdØ%}s N_21HUEDSI "_hüdse, hüst__hüdsi_" ;
merehüdsi+N:merehü%{tdØ%}s N_21HUEDSI "_#dse, #st__merehü|dsi_" ;
lõõvokõnõ+N:%{ˋØ%}#lõõvokõ N_22VWROKWNW "_#sõ, #ist__ˋlõõvokõ|nõ_" ;
rist́naglakõsõq+N:rist́naglakõ N_22VWROKWNW_PL "_#isi, #isi __rist́naglakõ|sõq_" ;
torokõnõ+N:torokõ N_22VWROKWNW "_#sõ, #ist__torokõ|nõ_" ;
mehenaanõ+N:mehe#naa N_22NAANW "_#asõ, #ist__mehena|anõ_" ;
ohonaanõ+N:oho#naa N_22NAANW "_#asõ, #ist__ohona|anõ_" ;
